Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.070

Original claims to be retained.

(1) The auditor shall also retain all original bills and indorse thereon claimant's name, nature of claim, the action had, and if a warrant was issued, date and number the voucher or claim the same as the warrant.

(2) The auditor may retain all claims, bills, and associated records referenced in subsection (1) of this section in an electronic format sufficient for the conduct of official business.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "claims" shall exclude claims filed against the county in accordance with the provisions of chapter 4.96 RCW.

[ 2003 c 72 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.070. Prior: 1893 c 119 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2710, part; 1869 p 310 s 5, part; 1863 p 549 s 5, part; 1854 p 425 s 5, part; RRS s 4086, part.]